West Virginia, session 2025, SB313.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of Environmental protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 23, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22-5-4 of this code, relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (standards of performance for new stationary sources, 45 CSR 16), is authorized.